Utah statutes.
53A-3-101.   Selection and election of members to Local Boards of Education.

Members of local boards of education shall be elected as provided in Title 20A, Chapter 14, Nomination and Election of State and Local School Boards.



Repealed and Re-enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

